Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB445.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 61.510 to 61.705, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the Kentucky Employees Retirement System created by KRS
61.510 to 61.705;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 61.645;
(3) "Department" means any state department or board or agency participating in the
system in accordance with appropriate executive order, as provided in KRS 61.520.
For purposes of KRS 61.510 to 61.705, the members, officers, and employees of the
General Assembly and any other body, entity, or instrumentality designated by
executive order by the Governor, shall be deemed to be a department,
notwithstanding whether said body, entity, or instrumentality is an integral part of
state government;
(4) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(5) "Employee" means the members, officers, and employees of the General Assembly
and every regular full-time, appointed or elective officer or employee of a
participating department, including the Department of Military Affairs. The term
does not include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency,
temporary, interim, and part-time workers. In case of any doubt, the board shall
determine if a person is an employee within the meaning of KRS 61.510 to 61.705;
(6) "Employer" means a department or any authority of a department having the power
to appoint or select an employee in the department, including the Senate and the
House of Representatives, or any other entity, the employees of which are eligible
for membership in the system pursuant to KRS 61.525;
(7) "State" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
(8) "Member" means any employee who is included in the membership of the system
or any former employee whose membership has not been terminated under KRS
61.535;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this
section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an
employee, on and after July 1, 1956, except that for members, officers, and
employees of the General Assembly this date shall be January 1, 1960, for which
creditable compensation is paid and employee contributions deducted, except as
otherwise provided, and each member, officer, and employee of the General
Assembly shall be credited with a month of current service for each month he or
she serves in the position;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a
fraction of a year, of employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1956, for which
creditable compensation was paid; except that for members, officers, and
employees of the General Assembly, this date shall be January 1, 1960. An
employee shall be credited with one (1) month of prior service only in those months
he or she received compensation for at least one hundred (100) hours of work;
provided, however, that each member, officer, and employee of the General
Assembly shall be credited with a month of prior service for each month he or she
served in the position prior to January 1, 1960. Twelve (12) months of current
service in the system are required to validate prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" at any time means the sum of all amounts deducted
from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in
the members' account, including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 61.560(4), together with interest credited, on such amounts
and any other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
credited thereon. For members who begin participating on or after September 1,
2008, "accumulated contributions" shall not include employee contributions that are
deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the
funds established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, as prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Means all salary, wages, tips to the extent the tips are reported for income tax
purposes, and fees, including payments for compensatory time, paid to the
employee as a result of services performed for the employer or for time during
which the member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's
federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips,
other compensation," including employee contributions picked up after
August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 61.560(4). For members of the General
Assembly, it shall mean all amounts which are includable on the member's
federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips,
other compensation," including employee contributions picked up after
August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 6.505(4) or 61.560(4);
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for
purchase of service credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's
total service with the system in which it is recorded if it is equal to or
greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites,
but the board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid
in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an
order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or for any creditable
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky
Commission on Human Rights, including notices of violations of state
or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or federal
discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during
which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer.
This subparagraph shall also include lump-sum payments for reinstated
wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the period
during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the
employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by
virtue of the member having taken a voluntary salary reduction provided
for under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made
available on or after January 1, 2001, for calendar years on or after
January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross income of the
employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for
accrued vacation leave, and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008,
lump-sum payments for compensatory time;
3. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016,
nominal fees paid for services as a volunteer; and
4. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky
State Police school resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" of a member means:
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the
member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest
average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit
during that five (5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years
may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of
service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-eight (48), one
(1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective
retirement date is between August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose
total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years and whose age and years
of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the
member was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number
of months of service credit during that three (3) years period multiplied by
twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal
years shall be used. Notwithstanding the provision of KRS 61.565, the
funding for this paragraph shall be provided from existing funds of the
retirement allowance;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a hazardous position, as provided in KRS 61.592, the creditable
compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was
paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The
three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-
four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the
creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) complete fiscal
years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of
service credit. If the member does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that
each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more
additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of
service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final
compensation calculation is at least sixty (60) months; or
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a hazardous position as provided
in KRS 61.592, the creditable compensation of the member during the three
(3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final
compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the
member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve
(12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years,
which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be
added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at
least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were
calculated during the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the
member's effective retirement date, including employee contributions picked up
after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 61.560(4). The rate shall be certified to the
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used to convert the
rate to an annual rate: two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8) hour
workdays, nineteen hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and one-half (7-1/2) hour
workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks, twelve (12) months,
one (1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is
entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the
basis of the actuarial tables that are adopted by the board. In cases of disability
retirement, the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be computed by adding ten
(10) years to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social
Security adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the
member's actual age shall be used. For members who began participating in the
system prior to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement option shall be less than
the same option computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date" means the sixty-fifth birthday of a member, unless
otherwise provided in KRS 61.510 to 61.705;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30, which shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the
limitation year used to determine contribution and benefit limits as established by
26 U.S.C. sec. 415;
(20) "Officers and employees of the General Assembly" means the occupants of those
positions enumerated in KRS 6.150. The term shall also apply to assistants who
were employed by the General Assembly for at least one (1) regular legislative
session prior to July 13, 2004, who elect to participate in the retirement system, and
who serve for at least six (6) regular legislative sessions. Assistants hired after July
13, 2004, shall be designated as interim employees;
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (5) of this section, shall mean
all positions that average one hundred (100) or more hours per month determined
by using the number of months actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year,
including all positions except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which
coincide in duration with a particular season or seasons of the year and which
may recur regularly from year to year, the period of time shall not exceed nine
(9) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not
exceeding thirty (30) working days and are nonrenewable; or
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or
the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or
filled specifically for addressing the employer's needs during and as a
result of the declared emergency;
(c) Temporary positions which are positions of employment with a participating
department for a period of time not to exceed nine (9) months and are
nonrenewable;
(d) Part-time positions which are positions which may be permanent in duration,
but which require less than a calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred
(100) hours of work per month, determined by using the number of months
actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of duty;
and
(e) Interim positions which are positions established for a one-time or recurring
need not to exceed nine (9) months;
(22) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under
KRS 61.552 means the employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60) months of service if under the age
of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service in the
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees
Retirement System;
(23) "Parted employer" means a department, portion of a department, board, or agency,
such as Outwood Hospital and School, which previously participated in the system,
but due to lease or other contractual arrangement is now operated by a publicly held
corporation or other similar organization, and therefore is no longer participating in
the system. The term "parted employer" shall not include a department, board, or
agency that ceased participation in the system pursuant to KRS 61.522;
(24) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or
any former member who has filed the necessary documents for retirement benefits
and is no longer contributing to the retirement system;
(25) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly,
monthly, or yearly rate of pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of
pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(26) "Beneficiary" means the person or persons or estate or trust or trustee designated by
the member in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available
benefits in the event of the member's death. As used in KRS 61.702, "beneficiary"
does not mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(27) "Recipient" means the retired member or the person or persons designated as
beneficiary by the member and drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the
member's death or a dependent child drawing a retirement allowance. An alternate
payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(28) "Level percentage of payroll amortization method" means a method of determining
the annual amortization payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of years but that may be
converted to a dollar value for purposes of KRS 61.565(1)(d). Under this method,
the percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years
remaining in the set period of time and the unfunded actuarially accrued liability
shall be projected to be fully amortized at the conclusion of the set period of years;
(29) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The
twelve (12) months need not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than
twelve (12) months;
(30) "Person" means a natural person;
(31) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority's office
building in Frankfort, unless otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority;
(32) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee
contributions are required to be reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or
78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive current service
credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise,
if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(33) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical
signs which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can
be observed; psychiatric signs which are medically demonstrable phenomena
indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation,
or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological,
or psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory
diagnostic techniques, including but not limited to chemical tests,
electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests;
(34) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
as provided in KRS 61.543;
(35) "Month" means a calendar month;
(36) "Membership date" means:
(a) The date upon which the member began participating in the system as
provided in KRS 61.543;
(b) For a member electing to participate in the system pursuant to KRS
196.167(4) or 311A.022(2) who has not previously participated in the system
or the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the date the member began
participating in a defined contribution plan that meets the requirements of 26
U.S.C. sec. 403(b);
(c) For members bound by an educational contract as a conditional employee to
the state of Kentucky[ prior to December 31, 2003], the date on which the
educational contract became effective; or
(d) For a member participating in the system pursuant to KRS 31.045, the earlier
of the date upon which the member began participating in the system under
paragraph (a) of this subsection or the date the member began employment
with the Louisville and Jefferson County Public Defender Corporation;
(37) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a
retired member, as defined by subsection (24) of this section;
(38) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(39) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
(40) "Accumulated employer credit" mean the employer pay credit deposited to the
member's account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS
16.583 and 61.597;
(41) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS 16.583 and 61.597,
the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and the
member's accumulated employer credit;
(42) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an
employer participating in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems without receipt of compensation for services rendered,
except for reimbursement of actual expenses, payment of a nominal fee to
offset the costs of performing the voluntary services, or both; and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or
independent contractor of the employer for which he or she is performing
volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12) months following the
retired member's most recent retirement date;
(43) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not
exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer.
Compensation earned for services as a volunteer from more than one (1)
participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum
provided by this subsection;
(44) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
KRS 61.592 or has not been approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(45) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in KRS 16.505 or who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's monthly final rate of pay
or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is
eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the
member's monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable
compensation earned by the disabled member during his or her last twelve
(12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty or duty-
related injury occurred;
(46) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS
61.505;
(47) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority;
(48) "Instructional staff" means the employees of a state college or university
participating under KRS 61.520 who are:
(a) Faculty;
(b) Staff responsible for teaching; or
(c) Other individuals employed in an administrative position that is eligible for
participation in the Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association (TIAA) of
the Teachers' Retirement System;
(49) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1646
employer who shall be responsible for forwarding all employer and employee
contributions and a record of the contributions to the system and for performing
other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 61.510 to 61.705; and
(50) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed
with regularity and is or may be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or
not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and on-call work.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed